California, session 20252026, SB542.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8670.28 of the Government Code is amended to read:8670.28. (a) The administrator, taking into consideration the facility or vessel contingency plan requirements of the State Lands Commission, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, the California Coastal Commission, and other state and federal agencies, shall adopt and implement regulations governing the adequacy of oil spill contingency plans to be prepared and implemented under this article. All regulations shall be developed in consultation with the Oil Spill Technical Advisory Committee, and shall be consistent with the California oil spill contingency plan and not in conflict with the National Contingency Plan. The regulations shall provide for the best achievable protection of the waters and natural resources of the state. The regulations shall permit the development, application, and use of an oil spill contingency plan for similar vessels, pipelines, terminals, and facilities within a single company or organization, and across companies and organizations. The regulations shall, at a minimum, ensure all of the following:(1) All areas of state waters are at all times protected by prevention, response, containment, and cleanup equipment and operations.(2) Standards set for response, containment, and cleanup equipment and operations are maintained and regularly improved to protect the resources of the state.(3) All appropriate personnel employed by operators required to have a contingency plan receive training in oil spill response and cleanup equipment usage and operations.(4) Each oil spill contingency plan provides for appropriate financial or contractual arrangements for all necessary equipment and services for the response, containment, and cleanup of a reasonable worst case oil spill scenario for each area the plan addresses.(5) Each oil spill contingency plan demonstrates that all protection measures are being taken to reduce the possibility of an oil spill occurring as a result of the operation of the facility or vessel. The protection measures shall include, but not be limited to, response to disabled vessels and identification of those measures taken to comply with requirements of Division 7.8 (commencing with Section 8750) of the Public Resources Code.(6) Each oil spill contingency plan identifies the types of equipment that can be used, the location of the equipment, and the time taken to deliver the equipment.(7) Each facility, as determined by the administrator, conducts a hazard and operability study to identify the hazards associated with the operation of the facility, including the use of the facility by vessels, due to operating error, equipment failure, and external events. For the hazards identified in the hazard and operability studies, the facility shall conduct an offsite consequence analysis that, for the most likely hazards, assumes pessimistic water and air dispersion and other adverse environmental conditions.(8) Each oil spill contingency plan contains a list of contacts to call in the event of a drill, threatened discharge of oil, or discharge of oil.(9) Each oil spill contingency plan identifies the measures to be taken to protect the recreational and environmentally sensitive areas that would be threatened by a reasonable worst case oil spill scenario.(10) (A) Standards for determining a reasonable worst case oil spill. However, for(B) Commencing January 15, 2027, and at least once every 10 years thereafter, in order to increase public participation, the administrator shall solicit public input regarding the appropriateness of the reasonable worst case spill volumes for facilities. Based on this feedback, the administrator shall review and, as appropriate, revise the criteria and formulas for calculating reasonable worst case spill volumes to reflect the best available information. If revisions are appropriate, the administrator shall initiate a rulemaking action pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3), which includes a public notice and comment process.(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), for a nontank vessel, the reasonable worst case is a spill of the total volume of the largest fuel tank on the nontank vessel.(D) Any review and rulemaking action undertaken pursuant to this paragraph shall be combined with and be used to inform the review and any rulemaking action undertaken pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 8670.37.51.(11) Each oil spill contingency plan specifies an agent for service of process. The agent shall be located in this state.(b) The regulations and guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall also include provisions to provide for public review and comment on submitted oil spill contingency plans.(c) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall specifically address the types of equipment that will be necessary, the maximum time that will be allowed for deployment, the maximum distance to cooperating response entities, the amounts of dispersant, and the maximum time required for application should the use of dispersants be approved. Upon a determination by the administrator that booming is appropriate at the site and necessary to provide best achievable protection, the regulations shall require that vessels engaged in lightering operations be boomed prior to the commencement of operations.(d) The administrator shall adopt regulations and guidelines for oil spill contingency plans with regard to mobile transfer units, small marine fueling facilities, and vessels carrying oil as secondary cargo that acknowledge the reduced risk of damage from oil spills from those units, facilities, and vessels while maintaining the best achievable protection for the public health and safety and the environment.SECTION 1.Section 8670.15 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 8670.14, to read:8670.15.In order to reduce the risk of an oil spill upon returning to service, notwithstanding any other law, every existing oil pipeline, as defined in Section 51010.5, that has not been in use for five or more years shall not be restarted without passing a spike hydrostatic testing program, performed in segments to ensure every elevation point will be tested, with a minimum test pressure between 100 percent and 110 percent of the specific minimum yield strength for a 30-minute spike test, immediately followed by a pressure test in accordance with Subpart E (commencing with Section 195.300) of Part 195 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 2. Section 8670.37.51 of the Government Code is amended to read:8670.37.51. (a) A tank vessel or vessel carrying oil as a secondary cargo shall not be used to transport oil across waters of the state unless the owner or operator has applied for and obtained a certificate of financial responsibility issued by the administrator for that vessel or for the owner of all of the oil contained in and to be transferred to or from that vessel.(b) An operator of a marine terminal within the state shall not transfer oil to or from a tank vessel or vessel carrying oil as a secondary cargo unless the operator of the marine terminal has received a copy of a certificate of financial responsibility issued by the administrator for the operator of that vessel or for all of the oil contained in and to be transferred to or from that vessel.(c) An operator of a marine terminal within the state shall not transfer oil to or from any vessel that is or is intended to be used for transporting oil as cargo to or from a second vessel unless the operator of the marine terminal has first received a copy of a certificate of financial responsibility issued by the administrator for the person responsible for both the first and second vessels or all of the oil contained in both vessels, as well as all the oil to be transferred to or from both vessels.(d) (1) An owner or operator of a facility where a spill could impact waters of the state shall apply for and obtain a certificate of financial responsibility issued by the administrator for the facility or the oil to be handled, stored, or transported by the facility.(2)For an oil pipeline subject to testing pursuant to Section 8670.15, there shall be a public notice and comment process before the administrator issues a certificate of financial responsibility pursuant to paragraph (1).(2) The administrator shall publicly post on the Office of Spill Prevention and Response internet website a list of all applications for certificates of financial responsibility submitted by facility owners and operators. The posting shall include the legal name of the applicant, the name and reasonable worst case spill volume of the facility to be covered by the certificate, the amount of financial responsibility demonstrated, and the type of evidence furnished to demonstrate the financial responsibility. The administrator shall post this information within seven business days of receiving an application.(3) (A) Commencing January 15, 2026, 2027, and at least once every 10 years thereafter, in order to increase public participation, the administrator shall review and revise the formulas for calculating reasonable worst-case spills and the financial assurances necessary to respond to an oil spill to reflect the best available information through a notice and comment rulemaking procedure. solicit public input regarding the appropriateness of the financial responsibility requirements for facilities. Based on this feedback, the administrator shall review and, as appropriate, revise the criteria and formulas for calculating the financial assurances and setting the maximum amount of a certificate of financial responsibility necessary to respond to an oil spill to reflect the best available information, pursuant to the rulemaking requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3), which includes a public notice and comment process.(B) Any review and rulemaking action undertaken pursuant to this paragraph shall be combined with and be used to inform the review and any rulemaking action undertaken pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 8670.28.(e) Pursuant to Section 8670.37.58, nontank vessels shall obtain a certificate of financial responsibility.SEC. 3. Section 51014.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:51014.1. (a) Any existing pipeline that transports oil and that is six inches or larger that has been idle, inactive, or out of service for five years or more, shall not be restarted without passing a spike hydrostatic testing program.(b) (1) (A) The hydrostatic spike test shall be at least 139 percent of the maximum operating pressure of the pipeline and shall not exceed 80 percent of the specific minimum yield strength, as determined appropriate by the State Fire Marshal.(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (A), at the operator’s request, the minimum hydrostatic spike test pressure may be lower than 100 percent of the specified minimum yield strength if the maximum operating pressure of the pipeline is correspondingly reduced. The hydrostatic spike test shall be at least 139 percent of the reduced maximum operating pressure of the pipeline, as determined appropriate by the State Fire Marshal. The hydrostatic spike test shall be performed in segments to ensure every elevation point will be tested.(2) If the specified minimum yield strength is unknown, the specified minimum yield strength shall be determined pursuant to Section 195.106(b) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations before performing the hydrostatic spike test.(c) The hydrostatic spike test shall be no more than 15 minutes, and be immediately followed by a hydrostatic test, which shall be held for a minimum of eight hours and meet the requirements of the State Fire Marshal.(d) The hydrostatic spike test shall be completed in segments for multielevational pipelines.(e) All tests shall be performed by a qualified testing company that is compliant with this chapter, as determined by the State Fire Marshal.(f) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.